Tennessee statutes. Title 58 Military Affairs, Emergencies and Civil Defense
Part 3

Militia

58-1-301. Call to active service — Enrollment of militia.

The governor, with the advice and consent of the general assembly, and pursuant to the laws of the United States, shall call the militia, or any portion thereof, into active service at any time that public safety requires it; provided, that the governor is authorized to have enrollment made of all persons of this state subject to military duty or draft into the military service, and is directed, at such time as the necessity seems imminent, to cause each county assessor to make such enrollment of the assessor's respective county, stating the name, address, age, and previous military or naval experience of all persons so enrolled, if any, and to furnish copies of such enrollment to the respective county clerk, and the adjutant general. Each county shall furnish all blank forms and bear all expenses necessary to enrollment of its citizens. The governor shall have the power, in the governor's discretion, to appoint an enrolling board of three (3) members in each county to act in lieu of the county assessor, which board shall make such enrollments as directed at the time by the governor. The governor shall have the power, and is directed, to issue, at the proper time, regulations in detail governing the entry or draft of enrolled citizens into the military service, and their assignments to units.

Acts 1933, ch. 128, § 25; C. Supp. 1950, § 1003.26 (Williams, § 845.25); impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 22, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 7-202.

Cross-References. Calling militia into service, Tenn. Const., art. III, § 5.

Call to active duty of military forces in general, § 58-1-106.

Composition of militia and designation as part of military forces of state, § 58-1-104.

Exemption of volunteer firemen from military duty in time of peace, § 7-38-104.

Governor may order military force to county on application of sheriff, § 38-3-112.

Military forces of state in general, § 58-1-104.

Performance of military duty, Tenn. Const., art. I, § 28, art. IV, § 1.

Reserve organization of the state guard authorized, § 58-1-410.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 18 Tenn. Juris., Military, § 9.

58-1-302. Failure to appear for service.

Any person subject to call into active military service of this state who fails to appear at the time and under conditions designated by the governor for entry or draft into active service shall be considered as a deserter and treated accordingly.

Acts 1933, ch. 128, § 27; C. Supp. 1950, § 1003.28 (Williams, § 845.27); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 7-203.

58-1-303. Election and appointment of officers.

All officers of the militia exercising command of line units shall be elected by ballot, and the governor, immediately upon calling the militia to active duty, shall issue appropriate rules and regulations for such elections, and appoint such number of staff officers in proper grades as may be required by the militia; provided, that persons eligible for commissions in the militia shall be the same as provided for the national guard.

Acts 1933, ch. 128, § 28; 1937, ch. 249, § 6; C. Supp. 1950, § 1003.29 (Williams, § 845.28); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 7-204.

Cross-References. Appointment and commissioning of all officers of the military forces by the governor, § 58-1-105.

Election of militia officers, Tenn. Const., art. VIII, § 1.

58-1-304. Uniform of militia.

The governor is authorized and directed, at the proper time, to issue the necessary regulations governing the uniform of the militia of this state; provided, that such uniform must comply with the laws of the United States.

Acts 1933, ch. 128, § 26; C. Supp. 1950, § 1003.27 (Williams, § 845.26); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 7-205.

58-1-305. Transfer of militia to national guard.

The governor, with the advice and consent of the general assembly, and in accordance with the orders of the president, may, after issuing call of the militia into active service, transfer the entire militia, or any portion thereof, to the national guard and treat it under the National Defense Act.

Acts 1933, ch. 128, § 29; C. Supp. 1950, § 1003.30 (Williams, § 845.29); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 7-206.

Compiler's Notes. The National Defense Act, referred to in this section, is codified at various locations in U.S.C. titles 10 and 32.

58-1-306. Disbanding of militia.

The governor, having called forth the militia into active service, is authorized to disband it, in whole or in part, as public interest and safety require, unless otherwise required by the government of the United States.

Acts 1933, ch. 128, § 30; C. Supp. 1950, § 1003.31 (Williams, § 845.30); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 7-207.